Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5869
Health care facility; license or permit; denial, revocation, or suspension; grounds.

(1) A license or permit which has been issued by the department under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or any other state statute to a health care facility which engaged in an activity identified as requiring a certificate of need under the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act without having first obtained a certificate of need or which engaged in an activity prohibited under the act is subject to revocation or suspension. Nothing contained in this section shall limit the rights of appeal of a health care facility from such decision as provided in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

(2) No license or permit may be issued or renewed by the department under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or any other state statute, nor may any type of approval be granted to any health care facility which engaged in an activity identified as requiring a certificate of need under the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act without having first obtained a certificate of need or which engaged in an activity prohibited under the act.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 69;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 35;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 121.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.